New York, session 2025-2026, S3771.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1263 of the public authorities law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 10 to read as follows: 3 10. (a) The authority shall hold hearings in each county affected by 4 proposed fare increases, major reductions of transportation and/or major 5 service changes. 6 (b) The hearing requirements set forth in paragraph (a) of this subdi- 7 vision shall not apply to standard seasonal or holiday adjustments, 8 temporary changes due to routine maintenance and/or temporary changes in 9 response to emergency situations. 10 (c) The authority shall hold a hearing in each county of a service 11 area that is affected by the proposed change or changes in fares or 12 services, provided that such hearings be limited to one hearing per 13 calendar day. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 15 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02406-01-5